Alaska statutes. Title 19. Highways and Ferries.
Chapter 30. Access Roads and Local Service Roads and Trails.

Cross references. —

For definitions applicable to this chapter, see AS

19.59.001

.

Collateral references. —

Accidents arising from merger of traffic on limited-access highway with that from service road or ramp. 40 ALR3d 1429.

Abutting owner’s right to damages for limitation of access caused by conversion of conventional road into limited-access highway. 42 ALR3d 13.

Measure and elements of damage for limitation of access caused by conversion of conventional road into limited-access highway. 42 ALR3d 148.